Illinois, session 104th, HB2405.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Sections 5-715 and 5-750 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/5-715)7    Sec. 5-715. Probation. 8    (1) The period of probation or conditional discharge shall 9not exceed 5 years or until the minor has attained the age of 1021 years, whichever is less, except as provided in this 11Section for a minor who is found to be guilty for an offense 12which is first degree murder. The juvenile court may terminate 13probation or conditional discharge and discharge the minor at 14any time if warranted by the conduct of the minor and the ends 15of justice; provided, however, that the period of probation 16for a minor who is found to be guilty for an offense which is 17first degree murder shall be at least 5 years. 18    (1.5) The period of probation for a minor who is found 19guilty of aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 20assault, or aggravated battery with a firearm shall be at 21least 36 months. The period of probation for a minor who is 22found to be guilty of any other Class X felony shall be at 23least 24 months. The period of probation for a Class 1 or Class   HB2405- 2 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b12 forcible felony shall be at least 18 months. Regardless of 2the length of probation ordered by the court, for all offenses 3under this subsection (1.5), the court shall schedule hearings 4to determine whether it is in the best interest of the minor 5and public safety to terminate probation after the minimum 6period of probation has been served. In such a hearing, there 7shall be a rebuttable presumption that it is in the best 8interest of the minor and public safety to terminate 9probation.10    (2) The court may as a condition of probation or of 11conditional discharge require that the minor: 12        (a) not violate any criminal statute of any 13    jurisdiction; 14        (b) make a report to and appear in person before any 15    person or agency as directed by the court; 16        (c) work or pursue a course of study or vocational 17    training; 18        (d) undergo medical or psychiatric treatment, rendered 19    by a psychiatrist or psychological treatment rendered by a 20    clinical psychologist or social work services rendered by 21    a clinical social worker, or treatment for drug addiction 22    or alcoholism; 23        (e) attend or reside in a facility established for the 24    instruction or residence of persons on probation; 25        (f) support the minor's dependents, if any; 26        (g) refrain from possessing a firearm or other   HB2405- 3 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1    dangerous weapon, or an automobile; 2        (h) permit the probation officer to visit the minor at 3    the minor's home or elsewhere; 4        (i) reside with the minor's parents or in a foster 5    home; 6        (j) attend school; 7        (j-5) with the consent of the superintendent of the 8    facility, attend an educational program at a facility 9    other than the school in which the offense was committed 10    if the minor committed a crime of violence as defined in 11    Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act in a 12    school, on the real property comprising a school, or 13    within 1,000 feet of the real property comprising a 14    school; 15        (k) attend a non-residential program for youth; 16        (l) make restitution under the terms of subsection (4) 17    of Section 5-710; 18        (m) provide nonfinancial contributions to the minor's 19    own support at home or in a foster home; 20        (n) perform some reasonable public or community 21    service that does not interfere with school hours, 22    school-related activities, or work commitments of the 23    minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian; 24        (o) participate with community corrections programs 25    including unified delinquency intervention services 26    administered by the Department of Human Services subject   HB2405- 4 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1    to Section 5 of the Children and Family Services Act; 2        (p) (blank); 3        (q) serve a term of home confinement. In addition to 4    any other applicable condition of probation or conditional 5    discharge, the conditions of home confinement shall be 6    that the minor: 7            (i) remain within the interior premises of the 8        place designated for the minor's confinement during 9        the hours designated by the court; 10            (ii) admit any person or agent designated by the 11        court into the minor's place of confinement at any 12        time for purposes of verifying the minor's compliance 13        with the conditions of the minor's confinement; and 14            (iii) use an approved electronic monitoring device 15        if ordered by the court subject to Article 8A of 16        Chapter V of the Unified Code of Corrections; 17        (r) refrain from entering into a designated geographic 18    area except upon terms as the court finds appropriate. The 19    terms may include consideration of the purpose of the 20    entry, the time of day, other persons accompanying the 21    minor, and advance approval by a probation officer, if the 22    minor has been placed on probation, or advance approval by 23    the court, if the minor has been placed on conditional 24    discharge; 25        (s) refrain from having any contact, directly or 26    indirectly, with certain specified persons or particular   HB2405- 5 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1    types of persons, including, but not limited to, members 2    of street gangs and drug users or dealers; 3        (s-5) undergo a medical or other procedure to have a 4    tattoo symbolizing allegiance to a street gang removed 5    from the minor's body; 6        (t) refrain from having in the minor's body the 7    presence of any illicit drug prohibited by the Cannabis 8    Control Act, the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 9    the Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, 10    unless prescribed by a physician, and shall submit samples 11    of the minor's blood or urine or both for tests to 12    determine the presence of any illicit drug; or 13        (u) comply with other conditions as may be ordered by 14    the court. 15    (3) The court may as a condition of probation or of 16conditional discharge require that a minor found guilty on any 17alcohol, cannabis, methamphetamine, or controlled substance 18violation, refrain from acquiring a driver's license during 19the period of probation or conditional discharge. If the minor 20is in possession of a permit or license, the court may require 21that the minor refrain from driving or operating any motor 22vehicle during the period of probation or conditional 23discharge, except as may be necessary in the course of the 24minor's lawful employment. 25    (3.5) The court shall, as a condition of probation or of 26conditional discharge, require that a minor found to be guilty   HB2405- 6 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1and placed on probation for reasons that include a violation 2of Section 3.02 or Section 3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals 3Act or paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 21-1 of the 4Criminal Code of 2012 undergo medical or psychiatric treatment 5rendered by a psychiatrist or psychological treatment rendered 6by a clinical psychologist. The condition may be in addition 7to any other condition. 8    (3.10) The court shall order that a minor placed on 9probation or conditional discharge for a sex offense as 10defined in the Sex Offender Management Board Act undergo and 11successfully complete sex offender treatment. The treatment 12shall be in conformance with the standards developed under the 13Sex Offender Management Board Act and conducted by a treatment 14provider approved by the Board.15    (4) A minor on probation or conditional discharge shall be 16given a certificate setting forth the conditions upon which 17the minor is being released. 18    (5) (Blank). 19    (5.5) Jurisdiction over an offender may be transferred 20from the sentencing court to the court of another circuit with 21the concurrence of both courts. Further transfers or 22retransfers of jurisdiction are also authorized in the same 23manner. The court to which jurisdiction has been transferred 24shall have the same powers as the sentencing court.25    If the transfer case originated in another state and has 26been transferred under the Interstate Compact for Juveniles to   HB2405- 7 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1the jurisdiction of an Illinois circuit court for supervision 2by an Illinois probation department, probation fees may be 3imposed only if permitted by the Interstate Commission for 4Juveniles. 5    (6) The General Assembly finds that in order to protect 6the public, the juvenile justice system must compel compliance 7with the conditions of probation by responding to violations 8with swift, certain, and fair punishments and intermediate 9sanctions. The Chief Judge of each circuit shall adopt a 10system of structured, intermediate sanctions for violations of 11the terms and conditions of a sentence of supervision, 12probation, or conditional discharge, under this Act. 13    The court shall provide as a condition of a disposition of 14probation, conditional discharge, or supervision, that the 15probation agency may invoke any sanction from the list of 16intermediate sanctions adopted by the chief judge of the 17circuit court for violations of the terms and conditions of 18the sentence of probation, conditional discharge, or 19supervision, subject to the provisions of Section 5-720 of 20this Act. 21    (7) Fines and assessments, including any fee or 22administrative cost authorized under Section 5-4.5-105, 235-5-10, 5-6-3, 5-6-3.1, 5-7-6, 5-9-1.4, or 5-9-1.9 of the 24Unified Code of Corrections, shall not be ordered or imposed 25on a minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or legal custodian 26as a condition of probation, conditional discharge, or   HB2405- 8 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1supervision. If the minor or the minor's parent, guardian, or 2legal custodian is unable to cover the cost of a condition 3under this subsection, the court shall not preclude the minor 4from receiving probation, conditional discharge, or 5supervision based on the inability to pay. Inability to pay 6shall not be grounds to object to the minor's placement on 7probation, conditional discharge, or supervision. 8    (8) The court shall require a minor to participate in 9social service programs offered through juvenile probation and 10comply with referral recommendations for no less than 3 months 11if the minor:12        (i) has previously been placed on probation for an 13    offense that involves the possession or discharge of a 14    firearm not causing any injury; and15        (ii) is convicted of a subsequent offense involving 16    the possession or discharge of a firearm not causing any 17    injury.18    If the minor does not complete the referral 19recommendations, the court shall commit the minor to the 20Department of Juvenile Justice to complete the recommended 21services. 22(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-379, eff. 7-28-23; 23103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 24    (705 ILCS 405/5-750)25    Sec. 5-750. Commitment to the Department of Juvenile   HB2405- 9 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1Justice.2    (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this Section, 3when any delinquent has been adjudged a ward of the court under 4this Act, the court may commit the minor to the Department of 5Juvenile Justice, if it finds that (a) the minor's parents, 6guardian or legal custodian are unfit or are unable, for some 7reason other than financial circumstances alone, to care for, 8protect, train or discipline the minor, or are unwilling to do 9so, and the best interests of the minor and the public will not 10be served by placement under Section 5-740, or it is necessary 11to ensure the protection of the public from the consequences 12of criminal activity of the delinquent; and (b) commitment to 13the Department of Juvenile Justice is the least restrictive 14alternative based on evidence that efforts were made to locate 15less restrictive alternatives to secure confinement and the 16reasons why efforts were unsuccessful in locating a less 17restrictive alternative to secure confinement. Before the 18court commits a minor to the Department of Juvenile Justice, 19it shall make a finding that secure confinement is necessary, 20following a review of the following individualized factors: 21        (A) Age of the minor.22        (B) Criminal background of the minor.23        (C) Review of results of any assessments of the minor, 24    including child centered assessments such as the CANS.25        (D) Educational background of the minor, indicating 26    whether the minor has ever been assessed for a learning   HB2405- 10 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1    disability, and if so what services were provided as well 2    as any disciplinary incidents at school.3        (E) Physical, mental and emotional health of the 4    minor, indicating whether the minor has ever been 5    diagnosed with a health issue and if so what services were 6    provided and whether the minor was compliant with 7    services.8        (F) Community based services that have been provided 9    to the minor, and whether the minor was compliant with the 10    services, and the reason the services were unsuccessful.11        (G) Services within the Department of Juvenile Justice 12    that will meet the individualized needs of the minor.13    (1.5) Before the court commits a minor to the Department 14of Juvenile Justice, the court must find reasonable efforts 15have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for the minor 16to be removed from the home, or reasonable efforts cannot, at 17this time, for good cause, prevent or eliminate the need for 18removal, and removal from home is in the best interests of the 19minor, the minor's family, and the public. 20    (2) When a minor of the age of at least 13 years is 21adjudged delinquent for the offense of first degree murder, 22the court shall declare the minor a ward of the court and order 23the minor committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice 24until the minor's 21st birthday, without the possibility of 25aftercare release, furlough, or non-emergency authorized 26absence for a period of 5 years from the date the minor was   HB2405- 11 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice, except that 2the time that a minor spent in custody for the instant offense 3before being committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice 4shall be considered as time credited towards that 5 year 5period. Upon release from a Department facility, a minor 6adjudged delinquent for first degree murder shall be placed on 7aftercare release until the age of 21, unless sooner 8discharged from aftercare release or custodianship is 9otherwise terminated in accordance with this Act or as 10otherwise provided for by law. Nothing in this subsection (2) 11shall preclude the State's Attorney from seeking to prosecute 12a minor as an adult as an alternative to proceeding under this 13Act.14    (2.5) A minor convicted of a subsequent offense involving 15the use or possession of a firearm causing serious injury, 16great bodily harm, or death shall be confined to the 17Department of Juvenile Justice with the Department providing 18services, including, but not limited to, education, mental 19health services, drug treatment, and mentoring. 20    (3) Except as provided in subsections subsection (2) and 21(2.5), the commitment of a delinquent to the Department of 22Juvenile Justice shall be for an indeterminate term which 23shall automatically terminate upon the delinquent attaining 24the age of 21 years or upon completion of that period for which 25an adult could be committed for the same act, whichever occurs 26sooner, unless the delinquent is sooner discharged from   HB2405- 12 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1aftercare release or custodianship is otherwise terminated in 2accordance with this Act or as otherwise provided for by law.3    (3.5) Every delinquent minor committed to the Department 4of Juvenile Justice under this Act shall be eligible for 5aftercare release without regard to the length of time the 6minor has been confined or whether the minor has served any 7minimum term imposed. Aftercare release shall be administered 8by the Department of Juvenile Justice, under the direction of 9the Director. Unless sooner discharged, the Department of 10Juvenile Justice shall discharge a minor from aftercare 11release upon completion of the following aftercare release 12terms: 13        (a) One and a half years from the date a minor is 14    released from a Department facility, if the minor was 15    committed for a Class X felony;16        (b) One year from the date a minor is released from a 17    Department facility, if the minor was committed for a 18    Class 1 or 2 felony; and19        (c) Six months from the date a minor is released from a 20    Department facility, if the minor was committed for a 21    Class 3 felony or lesser offense. 22    (4) When the court commits a minor to the Department of 23Juvenile Justice, it shall order the minor conveyed forthwith 24to the appropriate reception station or other place designated 25by the Department of Juvenile Justice, and shall appoint the 26Director of Juvenile Justice legal custodian of the minor. The   HB2405- 13 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1clerk of the court shall issue to the Director of Juvenile 2Justice a certified copy of the order, which constitutes proof 3of the Director's authority. No other process need issue to 4warrant the keeping of the minor.5    (5) If a minor is committed to the Department of Juvenile 6Justice, the clerk of the court shall forward to the 7Department:8        (a) the sentencing order and copies of committing 9    petition;10        (b) all reports;11        (c) the court's statement of the basis for ordering 12    the disposition;13        (d) any sex offender evaluations;14        (e) any risk assessment or substance abuse treatment 15    eligibility screening and assessment of the minor by an 16    agent designated by the State to provide assessment 17    services for the courts;18        (f) the number of days, if any, which the minor has 19    been in custody and for which the minor is entitled to 20    credit against the sentence, which information shall be 21    provided to the clerk by the sheriff;22        (g) any medical or mental health records or summaries 23    of the minor;24        (h) the municipality where the arrest of the minor 25    occurred, the commission of the offense occurred, and the 26    minor resided at the time of commission;   HB2405- 14 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1        (h-5) a report detailing the minor's criminal history 2    in a manner and form prescribed by the Department of 3    Juvenile Justice; 4        (i) all additional matters which the court directs the 5    clerk to transmit; and6        (j) all police reports for sex offenses as defined by 7    the Sex Offender Management Board Act. 8    (6) Whenever the Department of Juvenile Justice lawfully 9discharges from its custody and control a minor committed to 10it, the Director of Juvenile Justice shall petition the court 11for an order terminating the minor's custodianship. The 12custodianship shall terminate automatically 30 days after 13receipt of the petition unless the court orders otherwise.14    (7) If, while on aftercare release, a minor committed to 15the Department of Juvenile Justice who resides in this State 16is charged under the criminal laws of this State, the criminal 17laws of any other state, or federal law with an offense that 18could result in a sentence of imprisonment within the 19Department of Corrections, the penal system of any state, or 20the federal Bureau of Prisons, the commitment to the 21Department of Juvenile Justice and all rights and duties 22created by that commitment are automatically suspended pending 23final disposition of the criminal charge. If the minor is 24found guilty of the criminal charge and sentenced to a term of 25imprisonment in the penitentiary system of the Department of 26Corrections, the penal system of any state, or the federal   HB2405- 15 -LRB104 07319 RLC 17358 b1Bureau of Prisons, the commitment to the Department of 2Juvenile Justice shall be automatically terminated. If the 3criminal charge is dismissed, the minor is found not guilty, 4or the minor completes a criminal sentence other than 5imprisonment within the Department of Corrections, the penal 6system of any state, or the federal Bureau of Prisons, the 7previously imposed commitment to the Department of Juvenile 8Justice and the full aftercare release term shall be 9automatically reinstated unless custodianship is sooner 10terminated. Nothing in this subsection (7) shall preclude the 11court from ordering another sentence under Section 5-710 of 12this Act or from terminating the Department's custodianship 13while the commitment to the Department is suspended. 14(Source: P.A. 102-350, eff. 8-13-21; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.)